extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.aff
SFX Y   0           ych        in is:feminine is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   0           ych        in is:neuter is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   0           ych        in is:masculine is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ych        in is:feminine is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ych        in is:neuter is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   0           mu         in is:masculine is:dative
SFX Y   0           mu         in is:neuter is:dative
SFX Y   0           ym         in is:masculine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ym         in is:feminine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ym         in is:neuter is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   0           u          in is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   0           om         in is:masculine is:locative
SFX Y   0           om         in is:neuter is:locative
SFX Y   0           ou         in is:feminine is:instrumental
SFX Y   0           ymi        in is:masculine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   0           ymi        in is:feminine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   0           ymi        in is:neuter is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   0           a          ov is:feminine is:nominative
SFX Y   0           o          ov is:neuter is:nominative
SFX Y   0           i          ov is:masculine is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   0           e          ov is:neuter is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ho         ov is:masculine is:genitive
SFX Y   0           ho         ov is:neuter is:genitive
SFX Y   0           ej         ov is:feminine is:genitive
SFX Y   0           ej         ov is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   0           ych        ov is:masculine is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   0           ych        ov is:feminine is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   0           ych        ov is:neuter is:genitive is:plural
SFX Y   0           ych        ov is:masculine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ych        ov is:feminine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ych        ov is:neuter is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   0           mu         ov is:masculine is:dative
SFX Y   0           mu         ov is:neuter is:dative
SFX Y   0           ym         ov is:masculine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ym         ov is:feminine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ym         ov is:neuter is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   0           ym         ov is:masculine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   0           ym         ov is:feminine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   0           ym         ov is:neuter is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   0           u          ov is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   0           om         ov is:masculine is:locative
SFX Y   0           om         ov is:neuter is:locative
SFX Y   0           ou         ov is:feminine is:instrumental
SFX Y   0           ymi        ov is:masculine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   0           ymi        ov is:feminine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   0           ymi        ov is:neuter is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           e          y is:neuter is:nominative
SFX Y   y           e          y is:neuter is:accusative
SFX Y   y           e          y is:masculine is:nominative
SFX Y   y           e          y is:feminine is:nominative
SFX Y   y           e          y is:masculine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           e          y is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           a          y is:feminine is:nominative
SFX Y   y           i          y is:masculine is:nominative
SFX Y   y           o          y po:adverb
SFX Y   y           eho        y is:masculine is:genitive
SFX Y   y           eho        y is:neuter is:genitive
SFX Y   y           eho        y is:masculine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           ej         y is:feminine is:genitive
SFX Y   y           ej         y is:feminine is:dative
SFX Y   y           ych        y is:masculine is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ych        y is:feminine is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ych        y is:neuter is:locative is:plural
SFX Y   y           emu        y is:masculine is:dative
SFX Y   y           emu        y is:neuter is:dative
SFX Y   y           ym         y is:masculine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ym         y is:feminine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ym         y is:neuter is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           u          y is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           om         y is:masculine is:locative
SFX Y   y           om         y is:neuter is:locative
SFX Y   y           ou         y is:feminine is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           ymi        y is:masculine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           ymi        y is:feminine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           ymi        y is:neuter is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsie      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsie      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsie      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsie      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsie      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsie      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsia      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:nominative
SFX Y   y           ejsi       [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:nominative
SFX Y   y           ejsieho    [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:genitive
SFX Y   y           ejsieho    [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:genitive
SFX Y   y           ejsej      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:genitive
SFX Y   y           ejsich     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:genitive
SFX Y   y           ejsich     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:genitive
SFX Y   y           ejsich     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:genitive
SFX Y   y           ejsich     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           ejsich     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           ejsich     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:accusative
SFX Y   y           ejsiemu    [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:dative
SFX Y   y           ejsiemu    [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:dative
SFX Y   y           ejsej      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:dative
SFX Y   y           ejsim      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsim      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsim      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:dative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsiu      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:accusative
SFX Y   y           ejsich     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsom      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:locative
SFX Y   y           ejsom      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:locative
SFX Y   y           ejsim      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           ejsim      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           ejsou      [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:instrumental
SFX Y   y           ejsimi     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:masculine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsimi     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:feminine is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           ejsimi     [bklmnprtv]y is:comparative is:neuter is:instrumental is:plural
SFX Y   y           i          y is:masculine is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   y           e          y is:feminine is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   y           e          y is:feminine is:accusative is:plural
SFX Y   y           e          y is:neuter is:nominative is:plural
SFX Y   y           e          y is:neuter is:accusative is:plural
