extensions/1474684_sk-sk-ascii_spellchecking/sk_sk_ascii_spellchecking-2.4.7/dictionaries/sk-SK-ascii.dic
Bohov/Y po:adjective
Dublincanov/Y po:adjective
Haagcanov/Y po:adjective
Jasenova/Y po:adjective
Krkonossky/YN po:adjective
Magdeburcanov/Y po:adjective
Motovsky/YN po:adjective
Pavolov/Y po:adjective
Richterov/Y po:adjective
Stankovsky/YN po:adjective
Uruguajcov/Y po:adjective
abbeov/Y po:adjective
adriaticky/YN po:adjective
akupunkturny/YN po:adjective
amplionovy/YN po:adjective
antilopovy/YN po:adjective
archivarov/Y po:adjective
atemporalny/YN po:adjective
babkarsky/Y po:adjective
baraky/YN po:adjective
benediktinsky/YN po:adjective
bezostysny/YN po:adjective
biely/YN po:adjective
bledozlty/YN po:adjective
bonifikovany/YN po:adjective
brniansky/Y po:adjective
burzoov/Y po:adjective
celodreveny/YN po:adjective
certifikacny/YN po:adjective
chladnuci/YN po:adjective
chrustikov/Y po:adjective
cimbalistov/Y po:adjective
clivy/YN po:adjective
cynicky/YN po:adjective
decimovany/YN po:adjective
deltovy/Y po:adjective
despoticky/Y po:adjective
dialyzovany/YN po:adjective
disperzny/YN po:adjective
dobyvacny/YN po:adjective
dolnikov/Y po:adjective
doriesenie/YN po:adjective
drabov/Y po:adjective
drotovy/Y po:adjective
dvacattisicovy/Y po:adjective
dvojrecovy/YN po:adjective
egyptsky/YN po:adjective
endogenny/YN po:adjective
eugenikov/Y po:adjective
extrakapsularny/YN po:adjective
faunov/Y po:adjective
financny/YN po:adjective
fotoamatersky/Y po:adjective
futbalovy/Y po:adjective
generovany/YN po:adjective
gradientovy/Y po:adjective
habitualny/YN po:adjective
hegemonny/YN po:adjective
hlasnicky/YN po:adjective
hnojovicovy/YN po:adjective
horehronsky/YN po:adjective
hrcivy/YN po:adjective
humanitarny/YN po:adjective
hypotecny/YN po:adjective
importersky/YN po:adjective
inkasny/YN po:adjective
istucky/YN po:adjective
jednoslabicny/YN po:adjective
kamerunsky/YN po:adjective
kazdodenny/YN po:adjective
kogentny/YN po:adjective
konfetovy/YN po:adjective
kormutlivy/YN po:adjective
krepovy/YN po:adjective
kupcov/Y po:adjective
laosky/YN po:adjective
lietajuci/YN po:adjective
lupeznicky/YN po:adjective
mandatovy/YN po:adjective
medovnikovy/YN po:adjective
milulinky/YN po:adjective
mohacsky/YN po:adjective
muselinovy/YN po:adjective
naformatovany/YN po:adjective
napratany/YN po:adjective
navstiveny/YN po:adjective
neziclivcov/Y po:adjective
nudzny/YN po:adjective
obsedantny/YN po:adjective
odluceny/YN po:adjective
ohnivy/YN po:adjective
oplechovany/YN po:adjective
osminovy/YN po:adjective
pahorkovity/YN po:adjective
paskovy/Y po:adjective
periodicky/YN po:adjective
platbyschopny/YN po:adjective
podaromny/YN po:adjective
pohanov/Y po:adjective
polovhky/YN po:adjective
poradovany/YN po:adjective
potoceny/YN po:adjective
praktikantsky/YN po:adjective
predpisany/YN po:adjective
premodelovany/YN po:adjective
pretrpeny/YN po:adjective
prihlasovatelov/Y po:adjective
pritomnostny/YN po:adjective
protiprudovy/Y po:adjective
radiacny/YN po:adjective
regulacny/YN po:adjective
rimskokatolicky/YN po:adjective
rozkaty/YN po:adjective
rozstrapkany/YN po:adjective
sabotovany/YN po:adjective
satyrov/Y po:adjective
sendvicovy/Y po:adjective
simentalsky/YN po:adjective
skonzumovany/YN po:adjective
slapajovy/Y po:adjective
socialne/YN po:adjective
spisany/YN po:adjective
spriateleny/YN po:adjective
stavebny/YN po:adjective
strbanov/Y po:adjective
stvorkilometrovy/YN po:adjective
sumienkovy/YN po:adjective
sviniarikov/Y po:adjective
taxikarov/Y po:adjective
tieneny/YN po:adjective
transfuziologicky/YN po:adjective
trojtyzdnovy/YN po:adjective
ucenikov/Y po:adjective
umelohodvabny/YN po:adjective
uskalisty/YN po:adjective
uzkoprofilovy/YN po:adjective
velkoburzoazny/YN po:adjective
vidiecanov/Y po:adjective
vodorovny/YN po:adjective
vstreknuty/YN po:adjective
vyhotoveny/YN po:adjective
vyplachovy/YN po:adjective
vystaceny/YN po:adjective
vzbudzovany/YN po:adjective
zadrhnuty/YN po:adjective
zambijsky/YN po:adjective
zasadity/YN po:adjective
zazitkovy/YN po:adjective
zemepisny/YN po:adjective
zlatoplody/YN po:adjective
znesvareny/Y po:adjective
zrezany/YN po:adjective
zvucne/YN po:adjective
